Tennessee, session 114, HB0555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-1002, is amended by deleting
subsections (c) and (d) and substituting:
(c) Burglary is a Class D felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(1)(A)(xxi).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(1)(D)(xviii) and substituting:
(xviii) Section 39-13-1002 — Burglary — other than habitation;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
HB0555
001288
- 1 -